District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

2-303.19a

Report by Chief Procurement Officer.

Repealed.

History

Feb. 21, 1986, D.C. Law 6-85, § 319a
as added June 8, 2006, D.C. Law 16-122, § 2(f), 53 DCR 2834
Apr. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-371, § 1201(a), 58 DCR 1185